Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201472-258.03
School lands; sale; appraised value.

For purposes of sales of educational lands at public auction, appraised
value is the value as determined by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds.

Laws 2000, LB 1010, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB166, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB166, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB210, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB800, § 1.